Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.160

Payment date—Cancellation of lien.

The lien and interest may be paid on or before the first Monday in October following the entry of the order, upon presenting to the treasurer, a statement from the auditor showing the amount due. Upon payment the treasurer shall stamp the statement and file it in his or her records, and shall issue a receipt to the person making the payment, showing payment and shall deliver a duplicate to the auditor, who shall then cancel the lien.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6013; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.160. Prior: 1927 c 311 s 5, part; 1921 c 141 s 5, part; 1915 c 166 s 14, part; RRS s 2852, part.]